Utah statutes.
78B-5-820.   Amount of liability limited to proportion of fault -- No
contribution.
(1)  Subject to Section 78B-5-818, the maximum amount for which a defendant
may be liable to any person seeking recovery is that percentage or proportion
of the damages equivalent to the percentage or proportion of fault attributed
to that defendant.
(2)  A defendant is not entitled to contribution from any other person.
(3)  A defendant or person seeking recovery may not bring a civil action
against any person immune from suit to recover damages resulting from the
allocation of fault under Section 78B-5-818.
